Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.044

Shopkeeper's registration—Penalty—Ephedrine/pseudoephedrine/phenylpropanolamine.

(1) A shopkeeper registered as provided in this section may sell nonprescription drugs, if such drugs are sold in the original package of the manufacturer.

(2) Every shopkeeper not a licensed pharmacist, desiring to secure the benefits and privileges of this section, is required to register as a shopkeeper through the business licensing system established under chapter 19.02 RCW, and he or she must pay the fee determined by the secretary for registration, and on a date to be determined by the secretary thereafter the fee determined by the secretary for renewal of the registration; and must at all times keep said registration or the current renewal thereof conspicuously exposed in the location to which it applies. In event such shopkeeper's registration is not renewed by the business license expiration date, no renewal or new registration may be issued except upon payment of the registration renewal fee and the business license delinquency fee under chapter 19.02 RCW. This registration fee does not authorize the sale of legend drugs or controlled substances.

(3) The registration fees determined by the secretary under subsection (2) of this section may not exceed the cost of registering the shopkeeper.

(4) Any shopkeeper who vends or sells, or offers to sell to the public any such nonprescription drug or preparation without having registered to do so as provided in this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and each sale or offer to sell constitutes a separate offense.

(5) A shopkeeper who is not a licensed pharmacy may purchase products containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, only from a wholesaler licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.046 or from a manufacturer licensed by the department under RCW 18.64.045. The commission must issue a warning to a shopkeeper who violates this subsection, and may suspend or revoke the registration of the shopkeeper for a subsequent violation.

(6) A shopkeeper who has purchased products containing any detectable quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, in a suspicious transaction as defined in RCW 69.43.035, is subject to the following requirements:

(a) The shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed ten percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs in March through October. In November through February, the shopkeeper may not sell any quantity of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or phenylpropanolamine, or their salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, if the total monthly sales of these products exceed twenty percent of the shopkeeper's total prior monthly sales of nonprescription drugs. For purposes of this section, "monthly sales" means total dollars paid by buyers. The commission may suspend or revoke the registration of a shopkeeper who violates this subsection.

(b) The shopkeeper must maintain inventory records of the receipt and disposition of nonprescription drugs, utilizing existing inventory controls if an auditor or investigator can determine compliance with (a) of this subsection, and otherwise in the form and manner required by the commission. The records must be available for inspection by the commission or any law enforcement agency and must be maintained for two years. The commission may suspend or revoke the registration of a shopkeeper who violates this subsection. For purposes of this subsection, "disposition" means the return of product to the wholesaler or distributor.

[ 2013 c 144 s 14; 2013 c 19 s 8; 2005 c 388 s 5; 2004 c 52 s 2. Prior: 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 401; 1989 c 352 s 1; 1984 c 153 s 5; 1982 c 182 s 30; 1979 c 90 s 17.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2013 c 19 s 8 and by 2013 c 144 s 14, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Finding—Effective dates—Severability—2005 c 388: See notes following RCW 69.43.105.

Finding—2004 c 52: "The legislature finds that quantities of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, and phenylpropanolamine continue to be sold at the wholesale and retail levels far in excess of legitimate consumer needs. The excess quantities being sold are most likely used in the criminal manufacture of methamphetamine. It is therefore necessary for the legislature to further regulate the sales of these drugs, including sales from out-of-state sources, in order to reduce the threat that methamphetamine presents to the people of the state." [ 2004 c 52 s 1.]

Severability—2004 c 52: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2004 c 52 s 8.]

Effective date—2004 c 52: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 52 s 9.]

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.

Business licensing

delinquency fee—Rate—Disposition: RCW 19.02.085.

expiration date: RCW 19.02.090.

system

generally: RCW 18.64.011(2).

to include additional licenses: RCW 19.02.110.